Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4977.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9e. (1) The commission shall require that all electric utilities disclose in a standardized format on the customer's bill or with a bill insert all of the following: (a) The number of times the customer's service was interrupted during that billing cycle, excluding momentary interruptions. (b) The total number of hours, or portions of hours, the customer's service was interrupted during that billing cycle, excluding momentary interruptions. (c) The total number of momentary interruptions during the billing cycle. (2) If the commission finds, after notice and hearing, that an electric utility violated subsection (1), the commission shall order that electric utility to pay a fine of not more than $1,000.00 for each violation. (3) A customer attestation of service interruption and service restoration is sufficient evidence of a service interruption for purposes of this section. An electric utility may rebut a customer attestation with customer meter data. (4) The commission shall require each electric utility to provide the following information to the commission by March 1 each year, which the commission shall make available to the public: (a) A detailed identification of the cause of service interruptions that affected more than 1,000 customers of that electric utility in the previous calendar year. (b) The number of miles of tree trimming the electric utility projects to accomplish in that calendar year and the number of miles of tree trimming the electric utility accomplished in the previous year, broken down by zip code, city, and township. (c) The number of grid hardening or reliability projects performed in the previous calendar year, broken down by zip code, city, and township. (d) A list of the top 20% of worst-performing circuits in the electric utility's service territory in the previous calendar year using System Average Interruption Duration Index, System Average Interruption Frequency Index, and Customer Average Interruption Duration Index metrics. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Momentary interruption" means an interruption of service that lasts less than 5 minutes. (b) "Service interruption" means an interruption of service that lasts more than 5 minutes. (c) "Service restoration" means that the interrupted condition has been corrected and that the interrupted customer or customers have regained the full use of electric service.